Utah statutes.
56-2-2.   Movement of defective rolling stock prohibited -- Exceptions.

It shall be unlawful for any railroad corporation operating or in control of the operation of any railroad within the state of Utah to haul or transport or cause to be hauled or transported any broken or defective car, coach, locomotive or other rolling stock owned, leased or controlled by said railroad company or any broken or defective car, coach, locomotive or other rolling stock in the control or subject to the orders of said railroad company within the state of Utah, except that this act shall not apply to prevent the movement of such defective cars or equipment in case of fire, strikes or by an act of God where the movement of such defective equipment is required by any statute of the Congress of the United States, or where such cars or equipment are loaded for movement and will not move on their own wheels in such transportation. This act shall not be applicable to the movement of defective cars or equipment in local yard service or where the defects in the rolling stock shall occur while in transit, but such defective cars and equipment shall not be moved or transported a greater distance than the nearest repair point within this state where said company maintains shops equipped to repair such defect.

